Wisconsin, session 2025, AB956.
do enact as follows:AB956,1Section 1. 101.14 (5) of the statutes is created to read:101.14 (5) (a) In this subsection:1. “Automatic fire sprinkler system” has the meaning given in s. 145.01 (2).2. “Specified agricultural warehouse” means a building designed for the primary purpose of storing agricultural fertilizers, pesticides, fungicides, rodenticides, insecticides, and other crop protection products for distribution to agricultural producers.(b) Notwithstanding subs. (1) (a) and (4) (a) and s. 101.02 (15) (j), the department may not require and, notwithstanding s. 101.02 (7) (a) and (7r), no city, village, town, or county may require the installation of an automatic fire sprinkler system in a specified agricultural warehouse for which construction is initiated after the effective date of this paragraph .... [LRB inserts date], and that is used to store any of the following:1. Liquid bulk fertilizer or liquid bulk pesticide if the department of agriculture, trade and consumer protection requires the storage container of the liquid bulk fertilizer or liquid bulk pesticide to be located within a secondary containment structure that complies with rules promulgated by the department of agriculture, trade and consumer protection.2. Dry bulk fertilizer or dry bulk pesticide.(c) 1. Paragraph (b) does not apply to a specified agricultural warehouse that contains an office unless there exists from the office a means of egress in case of fire that does not pass through the area where substances described in par. (b) are stored.2. Paragraph (b) does not apply to an area within a specified agricultural warehouse or to a structure attached to a specified agricultural warehouse that is used as an office or store.3. Paragraph (b) does not apply to a specified agricultural warehouse unless the owner notifies the chief of the fire department of the city, village, or town in which the warehouse is located that water should not be used to suppress any fire occurring at the warehouse and of the chemicals stored at the warehouse and updates the chief of the fire department of any changes to the chemicals stored at the warehouse.4. Paragraph (b) does not apply to a specified agricultural warehouse after a change in its use or occupancy results in the specified agricultural warehouse not being used to store the substances described in par. (b) 1. or 2.5. Paragraph (b) does not apply to a specified agricultural warehouse that stores ammonium nitrate or anhydrous ammonia.(d) This subsection does not prevent the department or a city, village, town, or county from requiring any other fire detection, prevention, or suppression requirement authorized under this chapter other than an automatic fire sprinkler system. Down Down /2025/related/vetoedinfull/ab956 true vetoedenrolledbills /2025/related/vetoedinfull/ab956 vetoedenrolledbills/2025/REG/AB956 vetoedenrolledbills/2025/REG/AB956 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Vetoed in Full»AB956: Text as Enrolled × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting